Maine, session 132, LD1059.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
CONCEPT DRAFT
SUMMARY
This bill is a concept draft pursuant to Joint Rule 208.
This bill proposes to establish a process for the selection of delegates for a convention
called under the United States Constitution, Article V.
Page 1 - 132LR1792(01)